test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vaoma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `vaoma: # Verb (72+73) `vaoma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     vaoma+V+Inf/mA: vaoma
     vaoma+V+Inf: [vaodaq, vaioq]
     vaoma+V+Act+PrfPrc: vaonuq
     vaoma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [vaot, vaotu]

     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vao
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [vaot, vaodõq]
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaos
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vaomiq
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vaotiq
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vaosõq
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: vao
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vaio
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vaiot, vaioq, vaiodõq]
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vaio
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vaiomiq
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vaiotiq
     vaoma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vaioq, vaiovaq]

     vaoma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaotas

     vaoma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: vaova

     vaoma+V+Jus: vaoguq
